Connecticut, session 2026, HB05535.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of section 54-102uu of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(d) (1) If the Claims Commissioner determines that such claimant has
established such claimant's eligibility under subsection (a) of this section
by a preponderance of the evidence, the Claims Commissioner shall
order the immediate payment to such claimant of compensation for
such wrongful incarceration in an amount determined pursuant to
subdivision (2) of this subsection, unless (A) such compensation award
is in an amount exceeding thirty-five thousand dollars, or (B) such
claimant requests, in accordance with section 4-158, that the General
Assembly review such compensation award. The Claims Commissioner
shall submit any such compensation award described in subparagraph
(A) or (B) of this subdivision or an agreed to or stipulated award
pursuant to subsection (f) of this section in an amount greater than one
million five hundred thousand dollars, and the claim from which such
award arose to the General Assembly in the same manner as provided
under section 4-159, not later than five business days after the
commissioner issues such award determination or receives such request
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5535
for review, whichever is sooner. The General Assembly shall review any
such compensation award and the claim from which such award arose
not later than [forty-five] sixty days after such award and claim is
submitted to the General Assembly and may deny or confirm such
compensation award, or remand the claim to the Office of the Claims
Commissioner for such further proceedings as the General Assembly
may direct. If the General Assembly takes no action on such
compensation award, the determination made by the Claims
Commissioner shall be deemed confirmed.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 54-102uu(d)(1)
JUD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2